Utah statutes.
59-12-2212.1.   Transition provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a county, city, or town legislative body is not required to submit an opinion question to the county's, city's, or town's registered voters in accordance with Section 59-12-2208 and is not required to provide notice to the commission in accordance with Section 59-12-2209 if:

(1) (a)  on June 30, 2010, a county, city, or town imposes a sales and use tax under Section 59-12-501 that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 263;

(b)  on July 1, 2010, the authority for the county, city, or town to impose the sales and use tax described in Subsection (1)(a) is transferred to Section 59-12-2213; and

(c)  the rate of the sales and use tax described under Subsection (1)(a) and the rate of the sales and use tax the county, city, or town imposes under Section 59-12-2213 are the same;

(2) (a)  on June 30, 2010, a county, city, or town imposes a sales and use tax under Section 59-12-502 that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 263;

(b)  on July 1, 2010, the authority for the county, city, or town to impose the sales and use tax described in Subsection (2)(a) is transferred to Section 59-12-2214; and

(c)  the rate of the sales and use tax described under Subsection (2)(a) and the rate of the sales and use tax the county, city, or town imposes under Section 59-12-2214 are the same;

(3) (a)  on June 30, 2010, a city or town imposes a sales and use tax under Section 59-12-1001 that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 263;

(b)  on July 1, 2010, the authority for the city or town to impose the sales and use tax described in Subsection (3)(a) is transferred to Section 59-12-2215; and

(c)  the rate of the sales and use tax described under Subsection (3)(a) and the rate of the sales and use tax the city or town imposes under Section 59-12-2215 are the same;

(4) (a)  on June 30, 2010, a county imposes a sales and use tax under Section 59-12-1503 that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 263;

(b)  on July 1, 2010, the authority for the county to impose the sales and use tax described in Subsection (4)(a) is transferred to Section 59-12-2216; and

(c)  the rate of the sales and use tax described under Subsection (4)(a) and the rate of the sales and use tax the county imposes under Section 59-12-2216 are the same;

(5) (a)  on June 30, 2010, a county imposes a sales and use tax under Section 59-12-1703 that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 263;

(b)  on July 1, 2010, the authority for the county to impose the sales and use tax described in Subsection (5)(a) is transferred to Section 59-12-2217; and

(c)  the rate of the sales and use tax described under Subsection (5)(a) and the rate of the sales and use tax the county imposes under Section 59-12-2217 are the same; and

(6) (a)  on June 30, 2010, a county, city, or town imposes a sales and use tax under Section 59-12-1903 that is repealed by Laws of Utah 2010, Chapter 263;

(b)  on July 1, 2010, the authority for the county, city, or town to impose the sales and use tax described in Subsection (6)(a) is transferred to Section 59-12-2218; and

(c)  the rate of the sales and use tax described under Subsection (6)(a) and the rate of the sales and use tax the county, city, or town imposes under Section 59-12-2218 are the same.

